sn_ZW/sn_ZW.aff
PFX A 0 hatwuzopa . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzori . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzoru . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzorwu . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzoti . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzotu . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzotwu . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzou . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzova . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzowa . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzozvi . 
PFX A 0 hatwuzvi . 
PFX A 0 hau/Y . 
PFX A 0 haua . 
PFX A 0 haucha . 
PFX A 0 hauchado . 
PFX A 0 hauchafano . 
PFX A 0 hauchafumo . 
PFX A 0 hauchagaro . 
PFX A 0 hauchago . 
PFX A 0 hauchaisvo . 
PFX A 0 hauchambo . 
PFX A 0 hauchando . 
PFX A 0 hauchango . 
PFX A 0 hauchanguno . 
PFX A 0 hauchano . 
PFX A 0 hauchanyanyo . 
PFX A 0 hauchanyatso . 
PFX A 0 hauchasi . 
PFX A 0 hauchasvikiro . 
PFX A 0 hauchasviko . 
PFX A 0 hauchaswero . 
PFX A 0 hauchato . 
PFX A 0 hauchawanzo . 
PFX A 0 hauchazai . 
PFX A 0 hauchazo . 
PFX A 0 hauchi . 
PFX A 0 hauchido . 
PFX A 0 hauchifano . 
PFX A 0 hauchifumo . 
PFX A 0 hauchigaro . 
PFX A 0 hauchigo . 
PFX A 0 hauchiisvo . 
PFX A 0 hauchimbo . 
PFX A 0 hauchindo . 
PFX A 0 hauchingo . 
PFX A 0 hauchinguno . 
PFX A 0 hauchino . 
PFX A 0 hauchinyanyo . 
PFX A 0 hauchinyatso . 
PFX A 0 hauchisi . 
PFX A 0 hauchisvikiro . 
PFX A 0 hauchisviko . 
PFX A 0 hauchiswero . 
PFX A 0 hauchito . 
PFX A 0 hauchiwanzo . 
PFX A 0 hauchizai . 
PFX A 0 hauchizo . 
PFX A 0 haudo . 
PFX A 0 haudoa . 
PFX A 0 haudochi . 
PFX A 0 haudodzi . 
PFX A 0 haudohu . 
PFX A 0 haudohwu . 
PFX A 0 haudoi . 
PFX A 0 haudoka . 
PFX A 0 haudoku . 
PFX A 0 haudomu . 
PFX A 0 haudondi . 
PFX A 0 haudopa . 
PFX A 0 haudori . 
PFX A 0 haudoru . 
PFX A 0 haudorwu . 
PFX A 0 haudoti . 
PFX A 0 haudotu . 
PFX A 0 haudotwu . 
PFX A 0 haudou . 
PFX A 0 haudova . 
PFX A 0 haudowa . 
PFX A 0 haudozvi . 
PFX A 0 haudzi . 
PFX A 0 haufano . 
PFX A 0 haufanoa . 
PFX A 0 haufanochi . 
PFX A 0 haufanodzi . 
PFX A 0 haufanohu . 
PFX A 0 haufanohwu . 
PFX A 0 haufanoi . 
PFX A 0 haufanoka . 
PFX A 0 haufanoku . 
PFX A 0 haufanomu . 
PFX A 0 haufanondi . 
PFX A 0 haufanopa . 
PFX A 0 haufanori . 
PFX A 0 haufanoru . 
PFX A 0 haufanorwu . 
PFX A 0 haufanoti . 
PFX A 0 haufanotu . 
PFX A 0 haufanotwu . 
PFX A 0 haufanou . 
PFX A 0 haufanova . 
PFX A 0 haufanowa . 
PFX A 0 haufanozvi . 
PFX A 0 haufumo . 
PFX A 0 haufumoa . 
PFX A 0 haufumochi . 
PFX A 0 haufumodzi . 
PFX A 0 haufumohu . 
PFX A 0 haufumohwu . 
PFX A 0 haufumoi . 
PFX A 0 haufumoka . 
PFX A 0 haufumoku . 
PFX A 0 haufumomu . 
PFX A 0 haufumondi . 
PFX A 0 haufumopa . 
PFX A 0 haufumori . 
PFX A 0 haufumoru . 
PFX A 0 haufumorwu . 
PFX A 0 haufumoti . 
PFX A 0 haufumotu . 
PFX A 0 haufumotwu . 
PFX A 0 haufumou . 
PFX A 0 haufumova . 
PFX A 0 haufumowa . 
PFX A 0 haufumozvi . 
PFX A 0 haugaro . 
PFX A 0 haugaroa . 
PFX A 0 haugarochi . 
PFX A 0 haugarodzi . 
PFX A 0 haugarohu . 
PFX A 0 haugarohwu . 
PFX A 0 haugaroi . 
PFX A 0 haugaroka . 
PFX A 0 haugaroku . 
PFX A 0 haugaromu . 
PFX A 0 haugarondi . 
PFX A 0 haugaropa . 
PFX A 0 haugarori . 
PFX A 0 haugaroru . 
PFX A 0 haugarorwu . 
PFX A 0 haugaroti . 
PFX A 0 haugarotu . 
PFX A 0 haugarotwu . 
PFX A 0 haugarou . 
PFX A 0 haugarova . 
PFX A 0 haugarowa . 
PFX A 0 haugarozvi . 
PFX A 0 haugo . 
PFX A 0 haugoa . 
PFX A 0 haugochi . 
PFX A 0 haugodzi . 
PFX A 0 haugohu . 
PFX A 0 haugohwu . 
PFX A 0 haugoi . 
PFX A 0 haugoka . 
PFX A 0 haugoku . 
PFX A 0 haugomu . 
PFX A 0 haugondi . 
PFX A 0 haugopa . 
PFX A 0 haugori . 
PFX A 0 haugoru . 
PFX A 0 haugorwu . 
PFX A 0 haugoti . 
PFX A 0 haugotu . 
PFX A 0 haugotwu . 
PFX A 0 haugou . 
PFX A 0 haugova . 
PFX A 0 haugowa . 
PFX A 0 haugozvi . 
PFX A 0 hauhu . 
PFX A 0 hauhwu . 
PFX A 0 haui . 
PFX A 0 hauisvo . 
PFX A 0 hauisvoa . 
PFX A 0 hauisvochi . 
PFX A 0 hauisvodzi . 
PFX A 0 hauisvohu . 
PFX A 0 hauisvohwu . 
PFX A 0 hauisvoi . 
PFX A 0 hauisvoka . 
PFX A 0 hauisvoku . 
PFX A 0 hauisvomu . 
PFX A 0 hauisvondi . 
PFX A 0 hauisvopa . 
PFX A 0 hauisvori . 
PFX A 0 hauisvoru . 
PFX A 0 hauisvorwu . 
PFX A 0 hauisvoti . 
PFX A 0 hauisvotu . 
PFX A 0 hauisvotwu . 
PFX A 0 hauisvou . 
PFX A 0 hauisvova . 
PFX A 0 hauisvowa . 
PFX A 0 hauisvozvi . 
PFX A 0 hauka . 
PFX A 0 haukado . 
PFX A 0 haukafano . 
PFX A 0 haukafumo . 
PFX A 0 haukagaro . 
PFX A 0 haukago . 
PFX A 0 haukaisvo . 
PFX A 0 haukambo . 
PFX A 0 haukando . 
PFX A 0 haukango . 
PFX A 0 haukanguno . 
PFX A 0 haukano . 
PFX A 0 haukanyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haukanyatso . 
PFX A 0 haukasi . 
PFX A 0 haukasvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haukasviko . 
PFX A 0 haukaswero . 
PFX A 0 haukato . 
PFX A 0 haukawanzo . 
PFX A 0 haukazai . 
PFX A 0 haukazo . 
PFX A 0 hauku . 
PFX A 0 haumbo . 
PFX A 0 haumboa . 
PFX A 0 haumbochi . 
PFX A 0 haumbodzi . 
PFX A 0 haumbohu . 
PFX A 0 haumbohwu . 
PFX A 0 haumboi . 
PFX A 0 haumboka . 
PFX A 0 haumboku . 
PFX A 0 haumbomu . 
PFX A 0 haumbondi . 
PFX A 0 haumbopa . 
PFX A 0 haumbori . 
PFX A 0 haumboru . 
PFX A 0 haumborwu . 
PFX A 0 haumboti . 
PFX A 0 haumbotu . 
PFX A 0 haumbotwu . 
PFX A 0 haumbou . 
PFX A 0 haumbova . 
PFX A 0 haumbowa . 
PFX A 0 haumbozvi . 
PFX A 0 haumu . 
PFX A 0 haundi . 
PFX A 0 haundo . 
PFX A 0 haundoa . 
PFX A 0 haundochi . 
PFX A 0 haundodzi . 
PFX A 0 haundohu . 
PFX A 0 haundohwu . 
PFX A 0 haundoi . 
PFX A 0 haundoka . 
PFX A 0 haundoku . 
PFX A 0 haundomu . 
PFX A 0 haundondi . 
PFX A 0 haundopa . 
PFX A 0 haundori . 
PFX A 0 haundoru . 
PFX A 0 haundorwu . 
PFX A 0 haundoti . 
PFX A 0 haundotu . 
PFX A 0 haundotwu . 
PFX A 0 haundou . 
PFX A 0 haundova . 
PFX A 0 haundowa . 
PFX A 0 haundozvi . 
PFX A 0 haunga . 
PFX A 0 haungaa . 
PFX A 0 haungachi . 
PFX A 0 haungado . 
PFX A 0 haungadofano . 
PFX A 0 haungadofumo . 
PFX A 0 haungadogaro . 
PFX A 0 haungadogo . 
PFX A 0 haungadoisvo . 
PFX A 0 haungadombo . 
PFX A 0 haungadondo . 
PFX A 0 haungadongo . 
PFX A 0 haungadonguno . 
PFX A 0 haungadono . 
PFX A 0 haungadonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haungadonyatso . 
PFX A 0 haungadosi . 
PFX A 0 haungadosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haungadosviko . 
PFX A 0 haungadoswero . 
PFX A 0 haungadoto . 
PFX A 0 haungadowanzo . 
PFX A 0 haungadozai . 
PFX A 0 haungadozo . 
PFX A 0 haungadzi . 
PFX A 0 haungafano . 
PFX A 0 haungafanodo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanofumo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanogaro . 
PFX A 0 haungafanogo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanoisvo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanombo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanondo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanongo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanonguno . 
PFX A 0 haungafanono . 
PFX A 0 haungafanonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanonyatso . 
PFX A 0 haungafanosi . 
PFX A 0 haungafanosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haungafanosviko . 
PFX A 0 haungafanoswero . 
PFX A 0 haungafanoto . 
PFX A 0 haungafanowanzo . 
PFX A 0 haungafanozai . 
PFX A 0 haungafanozo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumodo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumofano . 
PFX A 0 haungafumogaro . 
PFX A 0 haungafumogo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumoisvo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumombo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumondo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumongo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumonguno . 
PFX A 0 haungafumono . 
PFX A 0 haungafumonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumonyatso . 
PFX A 0 haungafumosi . 
PFX A 0 haungafumosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haungafumosviko . 
PFX A 0 haungafumoswero . 
PFX A 0 haungafumoto . 
PFX A 0 haungafumowanzo . 
PFX A 0 haungafumozai . 
PFX A 0 haungafumozo . 
PFX A 0 haungagaro . 
PFX A 0 haungagarodo . 
PFX A 0 haungagarofano . 
PFX A 0 haungagarofumo . 
PFX A 0 haungagarogo . 
PFX A 0 haungagaroisvo . 
PFX A 0 haungagarombo . 
PFX A 0 haungagarondo . 
PFX A 0 haungagarongo . 
PFX A 0 haungagaronguno . 
PFX A 0 haungagarono . 
PFX A 0 haungagaronyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haungagaronyatso . 
PFX A 0 haungagarosi . 
PFX A 0 haungagarosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haungagarosviko . 
PFX A 0 haungagaroswero . 
PFX A 0 haungagaroto . 
PFX A 0 haungagarowanzo . 
PFX A 0 haungagarozai . 
PFX A 0 haungagarozo . 
PFX A 0 haungago . 
PFX A 0 haungagodo . 
PFX A 0 haungagofano . 
PFX A 0 haungagofumo . 
PFX A 0 haungagogaro . 
PFX A 0 haungagoisvo . 
PFX A 0 haungagombo . 
PFX A 0 haungagondo . 
PFX A 0 haungagongo . 
PFX A 0 haungagonguno . 
PFX A 0 haungagono . 
PFX A 0 haungagonyanyo . 
PFX A 0 haungagonyatso . 
PFX A 0 haungagosi . 
PFX A 0 haungagosvikiro . 
PFX A 0 haungagosviko . 
PFX A 0 haungagoswero . 
