sn_ZW/sn_ZW.dic
apuraya/AVQ
baka/AVQ
banidza/AVQ
batirana/AVQ
bayiswa/AVQ
besa/AVQ
bhadharika/AVQ
bhanya/AVQ
bheja/AVQ
bhidhiridza/AVQ
bhomba/AVQ
bhugucha/AVQ
bhuruvara/AVQ
bidyu/AVQ
binya/AVQ
bitira/AVQ
boira/AVQ
bongoma/AVQ
botsa/AVQ
buda/AVQ
bumaura/AVQ
bunhira/AVQ
bururira/AVQ
bvambura/AVQ
bvarukira/AVQ
bvidzura/AVQ
bvochesa/AVQ
bvoronga/AVQ
bvujonga/AVQ
bvumbamira/AVQ
bvundunuka/AVQ
bvuraudza/AVQ
bvuvana/AVQ
bwanyura/AVQ
bwendesa/AVQ
bwimba/AVQ
bwodogoka/AVQ
chachanura/AVQ
chairisa/AVQ
chakwatika/AVQ
chapfanya/AVQ
chayana/AVQ
checheuka/AVQ
chekeresa/AVQ
chenerudza/AVQ
chenutsa/AVQ
cherekedza/AVQ
cheyama/AVQ
chimbidzika/AVQ
chinya/AVQ
chivirira/AVQ
chomwira/AVQ
chuchudza/AVQ
chwehwedza/AVQ
daidzira/AVQ
damura/AVQ
darikidza/AVQ
dedemara/AVQ
demba/AVQ
dengenyika/AVQ
deruka/AVQ
dhadha/AVQ
dhana/AVQ
dhefuka/AVQ
dhima/AVQ
dhirivhara/AVQ
dhoma/AVQ
dhuguka/AVQ
dhuuka/AVQ
dikitirisa/AVQ
dinginda/AVQ
dododza/AVQ
dondodza/AVQ
dorinya/AVQ
dukunura/AVQ
dunduruka/AVQ
dusa/AVQ
dyidzana/AVQ
dzadzambira/AVQ
dzamhina/AVQ
dzaurira/AVQ
dzidza/AVQ
dzikatira/AVQ
dzimbirira/AVQ
dzingirira/AVQ
dziura/AVQ
dzoka/AVQ
dzongonyedza/AVQ
dzukuka/AVQ
dzurudzuta/AVQ
dzvara/AVQ
dzvita/AVQ
dzvutisa/AVQ
ema/AVQ
endesera/AVQ
ereketedzana/AVQ
fachurira/AVQ
famba/AVQ
fandyura/AVQ
farira/AVQ
fatyanura/AVQ
fefetedza/AVQ
femesa/AVQ
fenga/AVQ
ferutsa/AVQ
fidha/AVQ
finyanidza/AVQ
fizuka/AVQ
fomera/AVQ
fonyn'ora/AVQ
fotana/AVQ
fudigidza/AVQ
fufunuka/AVQ
fuhwa/AVQ
fukumuka/AVQ
fumbunura/AVQ
fundisira/AVQ
funganya/AVQ
funyana/AVQ
furatidza/AVQ
furufusha/AVQ
fushunura/AVQ
futyura/AVQ
gabhura/AVQ
gadzira/AVQ
gagama/AVQ
ganda/AVQ
ganya/AVQ
gasa/AVQ
gegedura/AVQ
giredha/AVQ
gofa-gofa/AVQ
gombedza/AVQ
gondisa/AVQ
goodza/AVQ
guchanira/AVQ
gumba/AVQ
gungudza/AVQ
gusvaira/AVQ
gwa/AVQ
gwagwavata/AVQ
gwebura/AVQ
gwigwinya/AVQ
hazura/AVQ
hura/AVQ
hwihwidza/AVQ
inzva/AVQ
jaja/AVQ
jenyengura/AVQ
jujisa/AVQ
kakachura/AVQ
kambaidza/AVQ
kanganisika/AVQ
kapita/AVQ
kasika/AVQ
kazha/AVQ
kiya-kiya/AVQ
kodzongera/AVQ
kombamisa/AVQ
konobhera/AVQ
korondoka/AVQ
kotsana/AVQ
kudziridza/AVQ
kumi/AVQ
kunyaira/AVQ
kusa/AVQ
kuza/AVQ
kwakwashika/AVQ
kwaraura/AVQ
kwedzera/AVQ
kwesvaira/AVQ
kwirindindika/AVQ
manika/AVQ
mbanya/AVQ
mbururuka/AVQ
mhan'arira/AVQ
minamisa/AVQ
monerana/AVQ
muruka/AVQ
mwaradza/AVQ
mweyesana/AVQ
namba/AVQ
nanzva/AVQ
ndenderedza/AVQ
ndonyera/AVQ
nenekedzera/AVQ
ngani/AVQ
ngorama/AVQ
nguzhaira/AVQ
nhamhuka/AVQ
nhuwidza/AVQ
njandanguka/AVQ
njobera/AVQ
n'oresa/AVQ
nyadzisa/AVQ
nyangadza/AVQ
nyatera/AVQ
nyenura/AVQ
nyezuka/AVQ
nyokosva/AVQ
nyunguduka/AVQ
nzuwaira/AVQ
nzwiyo/AVQ
onekera/AVQ
pabura/AVQ
pakasha/AVQ
pamira/AVQ
panicha/AVQ
para-para/AVQ
patirwa/AVQ
pedzisa/AVQ
penzura/AVQ
pesuka/AVQ
pfanhura/AVQ
pfetenuka/AVQ
pfochoka/AVQ
pfudza/AVQ
pfumbunura/AVQ
pfunhira/AVQ
pfurupfutika/AVQ
pihwa/AVQ
pindurudza/AVQ
pipitura/AVQ
piyanisa/AVQ
ponesa/AVQ
potserana/AVQ
pumhunwa/AVQ
pupura/AVQ
putira/AVQ
pwatitsa/AVQ
radanuka/AVQ
rambira/AVQ
raramisa/AVQ
razana/AVQ
remara/AVQ
rerukira/AVQ
riga/AVQ
rinza/AVQ
ronda/AVQ
rovambira/AVQ
rukirira/AVQ
ruruma/AVQ
sadharadza/AVQ
sandaridza/AVQ
sasauka/AVQ
sendama/AVQ
seseura/AVQ
shambidza/AVQ
shara/AVQ
shemwa/AVQ
shipura/AVQ
shongana/AVQ
shozhonodza/AVQ
shuva/AVQ
sima/AVQ
sisidzira/AVQ
songorodza/AVQ
sumba/AVQ
sunungura/AVQ
suwarara/AVQ
svedza/AVQ
svina/AVQ
svokota/AVQ
svukudza/AVQ
swetaira/AVQ
takamutsa/AVQ
tamika/AVQ
tangidzira/AVQ
tapudza/AVQ
tasanuka/AVQ
taurisa/AVQ
teka-teka/AVQ
temwa/AVQ
tenhengedza/AVQ
teruka/AVQ
tevera/AVQ
tikitidza/AVQ
tipfura/AVQ
todzana/AVQ
tononesa/AVQ
tsakuka/AVQ
tsatika/AVQ
tsendemuka/AVQ
tsika/AVQ
tsinhanisa/AVQ
tsokera/AVQ
tsubvunyuka/AVQ
tsura/AVQ
tsvangisa/AVQ
tsveta/AVQ
tsvotsoma/AVQ
tuchika/AVQ
tumhaira/AVQ
tunzva/AVQ
tutuma/AVQ
twiga/AVQ
udzira/AVQ
unganidza/AVQ
usha/AVQ
vandanyura/AVQ
vavaika/AVQ
vesesa/AVQ
vhavhukira/AVQ
vhikura/AVQ
vhomora/AVQ
vhundunyura/AVQ
vhuzhura/AVQ
voneka/AVQ
wandisa/AVQ
wayawaya/AVQ
wondomora/AVQ
yamurika/AVQ
yengerere/AVQ
zandandika/AVQ
zenge/AVQ
zherezheta/AVQ
ziriridza/AVQ
zungunisa/AVQ
zve/AVQ
zvionera/AVQ
